North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 3. State Laboratory of Public Health.

§ 130A-88.
Laboratory established.

A State Laboratory of Public Health is established within the Department. The Department is authorized to make examinations, and provide consultation and technical assistance as the public health may require.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary for the operation of the State Laboratory of Public Health.

History.
1905, c. 415; Rev., s. 3057; 1907, cc. 721, 884; 1911, c. 62, s. 36; C.S., s. 7056; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1979, c. 788, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.